test/src/dict-gt-yamls/V-tietted_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below) There are still problems
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - tieʹtted: # Verb 'to know' - full paradigm
     tieʹtted+V+Inf: tieʹtted
     tieʹtted+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: teâđam
     tieʹtted+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: teâđak
     tieʹtted+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: teâtt
     tieʹtted+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: tieʹttep
     tieʹtted+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: tieʹttveʹted
     tieʹtted+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: teäʹtte      # teäʼtˈte
     tieʹtted+V+Ind+Prs+Sg4: tieʹđet
     tieʹtted+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: tieʹđ
     tieʹtted+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: [tiõʹttem]
     tieʹtted+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: [tiõʹttiǩ]
     tieʹtted+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: [tiõʹđi, tieʹđi]
     tieʹtted+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: [tiõʹđim, tiõʹđin, tieʹđim, tieʹđin]
     tieʹtted+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [tiõʹđid, tieʹđid]
     tieʹtted+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [tiõʹtte, tieʹtte]
     tieʹtted+V+Ind+Prt+Sg4: tiõʹtteš
     tieʹtted+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: teâttam
     tieʹtted+V+Pot+Sg1: [tiõʹđžem, tieʹđžem]
     tieʹtted+V+Pot+Sg2: [tiõʹđžiǩ, tieʹđžiǩ]
     tieʹtted+V+Pot+Sg3: [tiõʹđež, tieʹđež]
     tieʹtted+V+Pot+Pl1: [tiõʹđžep, tieʹđžep, tiõʹđžim, tieʹđžim, tiõʹđžin, tieʹđžin]
     tieʹtted+V+Pot+Pl2: [tiõʹđžid, tieʹđžid] 
     tieʹtted+V+Pot+Pl3: [tiõʹđže, tieʹđže]
     tieʹtted+V+Pot+Sg4: [tiõʹđžet, tieʹđžet]
     tieʹtted+V+Pot+ConNeg: [tiõʹđže, tieʹđže]
     tieʹtted+V+Cond+Sg1: teâđčem
     tieʹtted+V+Cond+Sg2: teâđčiǩ
     tieʹtted+V+Cond+Sg3: teâđči
     tieʹtted+V+Cond+Pl1: [teâđčim, teâđčin, teâđčep]
     tieʹtted+V+Cond+Pl2: teâđčid
     tieʹtted+V+Cond+Pl3: teâđče
     tieʹtted+V+Cond+Sg4: teâđčeš
     tieʹtted+V+Cond+ConNeg: teâđče
     tieʹtted+V+Imprt+Sg2: tieʹđ
     tieʹtted+V+Imprt+Sg3: teâđas
     tieʹtted+V+Imprt+Pl1: tieʹttep
     tieʹtted+V+Imprt+Pl2: tieʹtted
     tieʹtted+V+Imprt+Pl3: teâttaz
     tieʹtted+V+Imprt+ConNeg: tieʹđ
     tieʹtted+V+Imprt+ConNegII: tiõttu      # tiõtˈtu
     tieʹtted+V+Actio+Ess: tieʹttmen
     tieʹtted+V+Actio: tieʹttem
     tieʹtted+V+Act+PrsPrc: tiõʹtti
     tieʹtted+V+Act+PrfPrc: teâttam
     tieʹtted+V+Pass+PrfPrc: tiõttum         # tiõtˈtum
     tieʹtted+V+VAbess: [tieʹđkani, tieʹđǩeännai]
     tieʹtted+V+Ger+Ess: tieʹđeen
     tieʹtted+V+Ger+Instr: tieʹđeeʹl
     tieʹtted+V+Act+PrfPrc: teâttam
